Hawaii statutes.
§431:10G-105 Tort liability. (a) With
respect to accidental harm incurred in or arising out of a motorcycle accident
or motor scooter accident, tort liability is not abolished.

(b) Any owner or operator of a motorcycle or
motor scooter involved in a motor vehicle accident as defined in section
431:10C-103 and who incurs accidental harm as defined in section 431:10C-103,
including such person's representative or legal guardian, shall have a cause of
action in tort as provided in section 431:10C-306. [L 1989, c 208, pt of §1; am
L 1997, c 251, §54]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next